Hawaii statutes.
§487-2 Office of consumer protection;
director. There is created within the department of commerce and consumer
affairs an office of consumer protection. The director of commerce and
consumer affairs shall be the director of the office of consumer protection and
may appoint an executive director of the office of consumer protection. The
executive director shall have been admitted to practice law before the supreme
court of this State and shall be exempt from chapter 76. [L 1969, c 175, §2; am
L 1980, c 302, pt of §2; am L 1982, c 204, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 60,
§3; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next